North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18C. North Carolina State Lottery.
Article 8. Miscellaneous.

§ 18C-170.
Preemption of local regulation.

A county or municipality shall not enact any ordinance or regulation relating to the Lottery, and this Chapter preempts all existing county or municipal ordinances or regulations that would impose additional restrictions or requirements in the operation of the Lottery. To the extent that this Chapter conflicts with any local act, this Chapter prevails to the extent of the conflict.

History.

2005-344, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 31.1(t1).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 31.1(t1), effective July 1, 2005, deleted “local law,” preceding “ordinance” and “laws,” preceding “ordinances” and made related punctuation changes in the first sentence.

§ 18C-171.
Lawful activity.

Other than this Chapter, any other public or local law, ordinance, or regulation providing any penalty, restriction, regulation, or prohibition for the manufacture, transportation, storage, distribution, advertising, possession, or sale of any lottery tickets or shares, or for the operation of any lottery game shall not apply to the operation of the Commission or lottery games established by this Chapter where the penalty, restriction, regulation, or prohibition applies only to the Lottery as operated by the North Carolina State Lottery Commission.

History.

2005-344, s. 1; 2005-276, s. 31.1(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2005-276, s. 31.1(u), effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section.

§ 18C-172.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2014-100, s. 5.2(f), effective July 1, 2014.

History.

2006-225, s. 1; repealed by 2014-100, s. 5.2(f), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 18C-173.
Limits on compensation increases.

Notwithstanding G.S. 18C-114(a)(11) and G.S. 18C-120(b)(3), the Lottery Commission, during any fiscal year, may not expend funds for merit and performance-based salary increases in excess of the funds that would have been expended had the Lottery Commission employees received the same across-the-board salary increases granted by the General Assembly to State employees subject to the North Carolina Human Resources Act. These merit and performance-based salary increases may be awarded on an aggregated average basis according to rules adopted by the Lottery Commission.

History.

2008-107, s. 26.12A; 2013-382, s. 9.1(c).

§ 18C-174.
Number of regional offices limited.

The Lottery Commission shall maintain no more than seven regional offices. A regional office may include a claims center, but in no event shall the Lottery Commission maintain more than seven regional offices as provided in this section.

History.

2015-241, s. 5.2(d).

§ 18C-175.
Use of public assistance funds.

The Commission and all lottery game retailers are prohibited from accepting any form of public assistance funds for the purchase of any lottery ticket or participation in any lottery game.

History.

2015-241, s. 5.2(d).